src/fst/incoming/bla_noun_test.lexc
LEXICON NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES
@D.number.PL@+Sg:@D.number.SG@%>yi # ; 
@D.number.SG@+Pl:@D.number.SG@%>istsi # ;
@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@+Non:@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@%>i # ;

LEXICON ANIM_INTERR
0 # ;
+INTERR:%>hpa # ;

! The following lexicon contains the enclitic pronouns or attached pronouns from Frantz 2017 Chapter 9
! Using the term D3Sg follows Frantz in distinguishing between the 3rd person pronoun used when there
! is only one argument (Distinct third person singular), and just the regular 3rd person pronoun.
! They are not marked as subject or object because they can be either.

LEXICON ENCLITICS
0 # ;
+PRO+3/0:%>aawa # ;
+PRO+3Pl:%>aiksi # ;
+PRO+D3Sg:%>áyi # ;
+PRO+0Pl:%>aistsi # ;

! End Code
